lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 12315 Y 2
SFX 12315 izti yzta/418 . 301
SFX 12315 iztis yztasi/418 . 301

SFX 12316 Y 2
SFX 12316 izti yzta/419 . 301
SFX 12316 iztis yztasi/419 . 301

SFX 12317 Y 2
SFX 12317 izti yzta/420 . 301
SFX 12317 iztis yztasi/420 . 301

SFX 12318 Y 2
SFX 12318 izti yzta/421 . 301
SFX 12318 iztis yztasi/421 . 301

SFX 12319 Y 2
SFX 12319 izti yzta/422 . 301
SFX 12319 iztis yztasi/422 . 301

SFX 12320 Y 2
SFX 12320 izti yzta/423 . 301
SFX 12320 iztis yztasi/423 . 301

SFX 12321 Y 2
SFX 12321 izti yzta/424 . 301
SFX 12321 iztis yztasi/424 . 301

SFX 12322 Y 2
SFX 12322 izti yzta/425 . 301
SFX 12322 iztis yztasi/425 . 301

SFX 12323 Y 2
SFX 12323 izti yzta/426 . 301
SFX 12323 iztis yztasi/426 . 301

SFX 12333 Y 1
SFX 12333 izti yztie/427 . 301

SFX 12334 Y 1
SFX 12334 iztis yztie/428 . 301

SFX 12335 Y 2
SFX 12335 izti izo/429 . 302
SFX 12335 iztis izosi/429 . 302

SFX 12336 Y 2
SFX 12336 izti izo/430 . 302
SFX 12336 iztis izosi/430 . 302

SFX 12337 Y 2
SFX 12337 izti izo/431 . 302
SFX 12337 iztis izosi/431 . 302

SFX 12341 Y 2
SFX 12341 kšti kšti/408 . 300
SFX 12341 kštis kštis/408 . 300

SFX 12342 Y 2
SFX 12342 kšti kšti/409 . 300
SFX 12342 kštis kštis/409 . 300

SFX 12343 Y 2
SFX 12343 kšti kšti/410 . 300
SFX 12343 kštis kštis/410 . 300

SFX 12344 Y 2
SFX 12344 kšti kšti/411 . 300
SFX 12344 kštis kštis/411 . 300

SFX 12345 Y 2
SFX 12345 kšti kšti/412 . 300
SFX 12345 kštis kštis/412 . 300

SFX 12346 Y 2
SFX 12346 kšti kšti/413 . 300
SFX 12346 kštis kštis/413 . 300

SFX 12347 Y 2
SFX 12347 kšti kšti/414 . 300
SFX 12347 kštis kštis/414 . 300

SFX 12348 Y 2
SFX 12348 kšti kšti/415 . 300
SFX 12348 kštis kštis/415 . 300

SFX 12349 Y 2
SFX 12349 kšti kšti/416 . 300
SFX 12349 kštis kštis/416 . 300

SFX 12350 Y 2
SFX 12350 kšti kšti/417 . 300
SFX 12350 kštis kštis/417 . 300

SFX 12361 Y 2
SFX 12361 kšti ška/418 . 301
SFX 12361 kštis škasi/418 . 301

SFX 12362 Y 2
SFX 12362 kšti ška/419 . 301
SFX 12362 kštis škasi/419 . 301

SFX 12363 Y 2
SFX 12363 kšti ška/420 . 301
SFX 12363 kštis škasi/420 . 301

SFX 12364 Y 2
SFX 12364 kšti ška/421 . 301
SFX 12364 kštis škasi/421 . 301

SFX 12365 Y 2
SFX 12365 kšti ška/422 . 301
SFX 12365 kštis škasi/422 . 301

SFX 12366 Y 2
SFX 12366 kšti ška/423 . 301
SFX 12366 kštis škasi/423 . 301

SFX 12367 Y 2
SFX 12367 kšti ška/424 . 301
SFX 12367 kštis škasi/424 . 301

SFX 12368 Y 2
SFX 12368 kšti ška/425 . 301
SFX 12368 kštis škasi/425 . 301

SFX 12369 Y 2
SFX 12369 kšti ška/426 . 301
SFX 12369 kštis škasi/426 . 301

SFX 12379 Y 1
SFX 12379 kšti škie/427 . 301

SFX 12380 Y 1
SFX 12380 kštis škie/428 . 301

SFX 12381 Y 2
SFX 12381 kšti ško/429 . 302
SFX 12381 kštis škosi/429 . 302

SFX 12382 Y 2
SFX 12382 kšti ško/430 . 302
SFX 12382 kštis škosi/430 . 302

SFX 12383 Y 2
SFX 12383 kšti ško/431 . 302
SFX 12383 kštis škosi/431 . 302

SFX 12387 Y 2
SFX 12387 uiti uiti/408 . 300
SFX 12387 uitis uitis/408 . 300

SFX 12388 Y 2
SFX 12388 uiti uiti/409 . 300
SFX 12388 uitis uitis/409 . 300

SFX 12389 Y 2
SFX 12389 uiti uiti/410 . 300
SFX 12389 uitis uitis/410 . 300

SFX 12390 Y 2
SFX 12390 uiti uiti/411 . 300
SFX 12390 uitis uitis/411 . 300

SFX 12391 Y 2
SFX 12391 uiti uiti/412 . 300
SFX 12391 uitis uitis/412 . 300

SFX 12392 Y 2
SFX 12392 uiti uiti/413 . 300
SFX 12392 uitis uitis/413 . 300

SFX 12393 Y 2
SFX 12393 uiti uiti/414 . 300
SFX 12393 uitis uitis/414 . 300

SFX 12394 Y 2
SFX 12394 uiti uiti/415 . 300
SFX 12394 uitis uitis/415 . 300

SFX 12395 Y 2
SFX 12395 uiti uiti/416 . 300
SFX 12395 uitis uitis/416 . 300

SFX 12396 Y 2
SFX 12396 uiti uiti/417 . 300
SFX 12396 uitis uitis/417 . 300

SFX 12407 Y 2
SFX 12407 uiti ūja/418 . 301
SFX 12407 uitis ūjasi/418 . 301

SFX 12408 Y 2
SFX 12408 uiti ūja/419 . 301
SFX 12408 uitis ūjasi/419 . 301

SFX 12409 Y 2
SFX 12409 uiti ūja/420 . 301
SFX 12409 uitis ūjasi/420 . 301

SFX 12410 Y 2
SFX 12410 uiti ūja/421 . 301
SFX 12410 uitis ūjasi/421 . 301

SFX 12411 Y 2
SFX 12411 uiti ūja/422 . 301
SFX 12411 uitis ūjasi/422 . 301

SFX 12412 Y 2
SFX 12412 uiti ūja/423 . 301
SFX 12412 uitis ūjasi/423 . 301

SFX 12413 Y 2
SFX 12413 uiti ūja/424 . 301
SFX 12413 uitis ūjasi/424 . 301

SFX 12414 Y 2
SFX 12414 uiti ūja/425 . 301
SFX 12414 uitis ūjasi/425 . 301

SFX 12415 Y 2
SFX 12415 uiti ūja/426 . 301
SFX 12415 uitis ūjasi/426 . 301

SFX 12425 Y 1
SFX 12425 uiti ūjie/427 . 301

SFX 12426 Y 1
SFX 12426 uitis ūjie/428 . 301

SFX 12427 Y 2
SFX 12427 uiti ujo/429 . 302
SFX 12427 uitis ujosi/429 . 302

SFX 12428 Y 2
SFX 12428 uiti ujo/430 . 302
SFX 12428 uitis ujosi/430 . 302

SFX 12429 Y 2
SFX 12429 uiti ujo/431 . 302
SFX 12429 uitis ujosi/431 . 302

SFX 12433 Y 2
SFX 12433 ulti ulti/408 . 300
SFX 12433 ultis ultis/408 . 300

SFX 12434 Y 2
SFX 12434 ulti ulti/409 . 300
SFX 12434 ultis ultis/409 . 300

SFX 12435 Y 2
SFX 12435 ulti ulti/410 . 300
SFX 12435 ultis ultis/410 . 300

SFX 12436 Y 2
SFX 12436 ulti ulti/411 . 300
SFX 12436 ultis ultis/411 . 300

SFX 12437 Y 2
SFX 12437 ulti ulti/412 . 300
SFX 12437 ultis ultis/412 . 300

SFX 12438 Y 2
SFX 12438 ulti ulti/413 . 300
SFX 12438 ultis ultis/413 . 300

SFX 12439 Y 2
SFX 12439 ulti ulti/414 . 300
SFX 12439 ultis ultis/414 . 300

SFX 12440 Y 2
SFX 12440 ulti ulti/415 . 300
SFX 12440 ultis ultis/415 . 300

SFX 12441 Y 2
SFX 12441 ulti ulti/416 . 300
SFX 12441 ultis ultis/416 . 300

SFX 12442 Y 2
SFX 12442 ulti ulti/417 . 300
SFX 12442 ultis ultis/417 . 300

SFX 12453 Y 2
SFX 12453 ulti ūla/418 . 301
SFX 12453 ultis ūlasi/418 . 301

SFX 12454 Y 2
SFX 12454 ulti ūla/419 . 301
SFX 12454 ultis ūlasi/419 . 301

SFX 12455 Y 2
SFX 12455 ulti ūla/420 . 301
SFX 12455 ultis ūlasi/420 . 301

SFX 12456 Y 2
SFX 12456 ulti ūla/421 . 301
SFX 12456 ultis ūlasi/421 . 301

SFX 12457 Y 2
SFX 12457 ulti ūla/422 . 301
SFX 12457 ultis ūlasi/422 . 301

SFX 12458 Y 2
SFX 12458 ulti ūla/423 . 301
SFX 12458 ultis ūlasi/423 . 301

SFX 12459 Y 2
SFX 12459 ulti ūla/424 . 301
SFX 12459 ultis ūlasi/424 . 301

SFX 12460 Y 2
SFX 12460 ulti ūla/425 . 301
SFX 12460 ultis ūlasi/425 . 301

SFX 12461 Y 2
SFX 12461 ulti ūla/426 . 301
SFX 12461 ultis ūlasi/426 . 301

SFX 12471 Y 1
SFX 12471 ulti ūlie/427 . 301

SFX 12472 Y 1
SFX 12472 ultis ūlie/428 . 301

SFX 12473 Y 2
SFX 12473 ulti ulo/429 . 302
SFX 12473 ultis ulosi/429 . 302

SFX 12474 Y 2
SFX 12474 ulti ulo/430 . 302
SFX 12474 ultis ulosi/430 . 302

SFX 12475 Y 2
SFX 12475 ulti ulo/431 . 302
SFX 12475 ultis ulosi/431 . 302

SFX 12479 Y 2
SFX 12479 ūti ūti/408 . 300
SFX 12479 ūtis ūtis/408 . 300

SFX 12480 Y 2
SFX 12480 ūti ūti/438 . 300
SFX 12480 ūtis ūtis/438 . 300

SFX 12481 Y 2
SFX 12481 ūti ūti/410 . 300
SFX 12481 ūtis ūtis/410 . 300

SFX 12482 Y 2
SFX 12482 ūti ūti/411 . 300
SFX 12482 ūtis ūtis/411 . 300

SFX 12483 Y 2
SFX 12483 ūti ūti/412 . 300
SFX 12483 ūtis ūtis/412 . 300

SFX 12484 Y 2
SFX 12484 ūti ūti/413 . 300
SFX 12484 ūtis ūtis/413 . 300

SFX 12485 Y 2
SFX 12485 ūti ūti/414 . 300
SFX 12485 ūtis ūtis/414 . 300

SFX 12486 Y 2
SFX 12486 ūti ūti/415 . 300
SFX 12486 ūtis ūtis/415 . 300

SFX 12487 Y 2
SFX 12487 ūti ūti/416 . 300
SFX 12487 ūtis ūtis/416 . 300

SFX 12488 Y 2
SFX 12488 ūti ūti/417 . 300
SFX 12488 ūtis ūtis/417 . 300

SFX 12499 Y 6
SFX 12499 ūti ūva/418 . 301
SFX 12499 ūtis ūvasi/418 . 301
SFX 12499 ūti ūsta/418 . 301
SFX 12499 ūtis ūstasi/418 . 301
SFX 12499 ūti ūna/418 . 301
SFX 12499 ūtis ūnasi/418 . 301

SFX 12500 Y 6
SFX 12500 ūti ūva/419 . 301
SFX 12500 ūtis ūvasi/419 . 301
SFX 12500 ūti ūsta/419 . 301
SFX 12500 ūtis ūstasi/419 . 301
SFX 12500 ūti ūna/419 . 301
SFX 12500 ūtis ūnasi/419 . 301

SFX 12501 Y 6
SFX 12501 ūti ūva/420 . 301
SFX 12501 ūtis ūvasi/420 . 301
SFX 12501 ūti ūsta/420 . 301
SFX 12501 ūtis ūstasi/420 . 301
SFX 12501 ūti ūna/420 . 301
SFX 12501 ūtis ūnasi/420 . 301

SFX 12502 Y 6
SFX 12502 ūti ūva/421 . 301
SFX 12502 ūtis ūvasi/421 . 301
SFX 12502 ūti ūsta/421 . 301
SFX 12502 ūtis ūstasi/421 . 301
SFX 12502 ūti ūna/421 . 301
SFX 12502 ūtis ūnasi/421 . 301

AF 12387,12388,12407,12427,9999 # 113
AF 12479,12480,12499,12559,9999 # 243
AF 12341,12342,12361,12381,9999 # 376
AF 12479,12480,12499,12517,12518,12559,9999 # 395
