lt-LT.dic
apduiti/113	11
bežūti/243	11
neapduiti/113	33
nebepražūti/243	33
nebežūti/243	33
nepražūti/243	33
nežūti/243	33
pražūti/243	11
sučirkšti/376	11
tebeapduiti/113	11
tebežūti/243	11
tepražūti/243	11
težūti/243	11
žūti/395	11
